Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.526

Secured party.

"Secured party" has the same meaning as in *RCW 62A.1-201.

[ 2010 c 161 s 140.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to RCW 62A.1-201 appears to be erroneous. Reference to RCW 62A.9A-102 was apparently intended.

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.